Hawaii statutes.
GENERAL
PROVISIONS

§235-115 Assessments, etc., prima facie
proof. The effect of the notices of assessments and records prepared by or
under the authority of the department of taxation shall be as set forth in
sections 231-20 and 235-107. [L Sp 1957, c 1, pt of §2; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1,
§16; Supp, §121-47; HRS §235-115]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next